Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.0146, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Advisory council created. The Cuyuna Country State Recreation Area Citizens Advisory Council is established. Membership on the advisory council shall include: (1) a representative of Cuyuna Range Economic Development Inc.; deleted text begin (2) a representative for the Croft Mine Historical Park; deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end a member at large appointed by the members of the council; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a representative of the Crow Wing County Board; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end the state senator representing the state recreation area; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end the member from the state house of representatives representing the state recreation area; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end a representative of the Grand Rapids regional office of the Department of Natural Resources; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end a designee of the commissioner of Iron Range resources and rehabilitation; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end a designee of the local business community selected by the area chambers of commerce; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end a designee of the local environmental community selected by the Crow Wing County District 5 commissioner; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end a designee of a local education organization selected by the Crosby-Ironton School Board; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end a designee of one of the recreation area user groups selected by the Cuyuna Range Chamber of Commerce; and deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end a member of the Cuyuna Country Heritage Preservation Society.